That paint smells so bad.
Why do they paint and build everything?
Fashion and clothing," she read.
The man bowed to her.
It was Annushka's husband.
'Our vermin,' she remembered, as was the words of Vronsky. 'Ours? Why ours?
It's a terrible thing that can't be ripped out with the root of the past.
You can't rip it out, but you can hide his memory.
And I'll hide it."
And then she remembered her past with Alexei Alexandrovich, how she wiped him out of her memory.
"Dollie's gonna think I'm leaving my second husband and that's why I'm probably wrong.
I don't want to be right!
I can't!" 'She talked, and she wanted to cry.'
But she immediately began to think about what those two girls might have been smiling at.
"Right, about love?
They don't know how funny it is, how low...
Boulevard and the kids.
Three boys running around playing horses.
Serezha!
And I'm gonna lose everything, and I'm not gonna bring it back.
Yeah, I'll lose everything if he doesn't come back.
He may have missed the train, and he's back now.
You want humiliation again! 'She said to herself. 'No, I'll go in to Dolly and I'll tell her straight: I'm unhappy, I'm worth it, I'm guilty, but I'm unhappy, so help me.
These horses, this wheelchair -- how disgusting I am in this wheelchair -- all of it; but I will never see them again."
'Hello? 'She asked in front.'
'Caterina Alexandrovna Levina,' answered the footman.
"Kiti! The very Kitty he fell in love with,' thought Anna, 'the one he remembered with love.
He regrets not marrying her.
And he remembers me with hatred and regrets that he has come to me."
There was a feeding meeting between the sisters while Anna arrived.
Dolly alone went out to meet a guest who was interrupting their conversation at this moment.
'Ah, you haven't left yet?
'I wanted to be with you myself,' she said, 'now I have received a letter from Steve.
'We too have received the message,' replied Anna, looking back to see Kitty.
'He writes that he can't understand exactly what Alexis Alexandrovich wants, but that he will not leave without an answer.
'I thought you had someone.
Can I read the letter?
'Yes, Kitty,' said Dolly, embarrassed,'she stayed in the nursery.
She was very sick.
'I heard.
'I'll get it for you.
But he does not refuse; on the contrary, Steve hopes,' said Dolly, stopping at the door.
'I do not hope, nor do I wish,' said Anna.
"Well, does Kitty think it's humiliating to meet me? 'I thought Anna was alone.' 'Maybe she's right.
But not her, the one who was in love with Wronski, not her to show me this, even though it's true.
I know no decent woman can accept me in my position.
I know I sacrificed everything to him from that first minute!
And here's the reward!
Oh, I hate him so much!
Why did I come here?
Even worse, even harder,' she heard from the other room the voices of the two sisters who had spoken. 'What am I gonna say now to Dolly?'
To comfort Kitty that I'm unhappy, to obey her patronymic?
No, and Dolly won't understand.
And I have nothing to say to her.
It would only be interesting to see Kitty and show her how much I despise everyone, how much I don't care anymore."
Dolly came in with a letter.
Anna read it and gave it silently.
'I knew all that,' she said. 'And I am not interested in that at all.
'Why not?
On the contrary, I hope so,' said Dolly, curiously looking at Anna.
She's never seen her in such a strangely annoying state. 'When are you going?' 'She asked.'
Anna looked down before herself and did not answer her.
'Why is Kitty hiding from me? 'She said, looking at the door and red.
'Oh, it's nothing!
She's feeding, and she's not doing well, so I told her...
She's very happy.
She is about to come,' said Dolly, embarrassingly untruthful. 'Here she is.
When she found out that Anna had arrived, Kitty wanted to stay away; but Dolly talked her into it.
As she gathered her strength, Kitty came out and, blushing, came up to her and gave her hand.
'I am very pleased,' she said with a trembling voice.
Kitty was embarrassed by the struggle that took place in her, between the hostility toward this wicked woman and the desire to be condescending to her; but as soon as she saw Anna's beautiful, handsome face, all the hostility immediately disappeared.
'I wouldn't be surprised if you didn't want to meet me.'
I'm used to everything.
Were you ill?
Yes, you have changed,' said Anna.
Kitty felt that Anna looked at her hostilely.
She attributed this hostility to the awkward situation in which Anna, who had previously protected her, now felt sorry for her.
They talked about the disease, the baby, Steve, but apparently nothing interested Anna.
'I came to say goodbye to you,' she said, getting up.
'When are you going?'
But Anna again turned to Kitty without answering.
'Yes, I am very glad to see you,' she said with a smile. 'I have heard so much about you from all sides, even from your husband.
I had it, and I liked it very much,' apparently with a bad intention, she added it. 'Where is he?
'He went to the village,' said Kitty, blushing.
'Bow to him from me, surely bow.'
'Surely!' said Kitty naively, looking her in the eye.
'So goodbye, Dolly!' And by kissing Dolly and shaking Kitty's hand, Anna came out in haste.
'It's still as attractive as it is.
Very good!' said Kitty, alone with her sister. 'But there's something pathetic about her! It's awful pathetic!
'No, there is something special about her today,' said Dolly. 'When I walked her in the front, I thought she wanted to cry.
Anna got into a wheelchair in an even worse condition than she was when she left home.
Insult and rejection, which she clearly felt when she met Kitty, have now joined her previous torment.
'Where do you want me to go?
Home? 'Peter asked.'
'Yes, to go home,' she said, without even thinking about where she was going.
"How they looked at me like something scary, confusing and curious.
What can he talk about with such heat? 'I thought she was looking at two pedestrians.' 'Is it possible to tell someone else what you feel?
I wanted to tell Dolly, and it's a good thing I didn't.
How happy she would have been for my misfortune!
She would hide it; but the main feeling would be that I was punished for the pleasures she envied me.
Kitty, she'd be even more happy.
I can see right through her!
She knows I'm more than usual, kind to her husband.
And she's jealous and hates me. And despises more.
In her eyes, I am an immoral woman.
If I were an immoral woman, I could fall in love with her husband... if I wanted to.
Yeah, that's what I wanted.
This one is pleased with herself,' she thought of a fat, blushing gentleman who passed by, took her as a friend and raised her hair above a bald, bald head and then made sure that he had made a mistake. 'He thought he knew me.
And he doesn't know me as much as anyone in the world knows me.
I don't know.
I know my appetites, as the French say.
They want that dirty ice cream. They probably know that,' she thought, looking at the two boys who stopped the ice-cream, who took the pebble off his head and wiped his sweaty face with the end of the towel. 'We all want sweet, delicious.'
No candy, no dirty ice cream.
And Kitty's also, it's not Wronsky, it's Levin.
And she's jealous of me.
And hates me.
And we all hate each other.
I'm Kitty, Kitty, me.
That's the truth.
Tutkin, coiffeur.
Je me fais coiffer par Tutkin...
I will tell him that when he arrives,' she thought and smiled.
But at the same moment, she remembered she didn't have anyone to say anything funny anymore. 'And nothing funny, nothing funny.'
It's gross.
They're calling tonight, and this guy's getting baptized. 'Surely afraid to drop something.'
Why are these churches, this call, and this lie?
Just to hide the fact that we all hate each other, like these drivers who fight so hard.
Yashwin says he wants to leave me without my shirt, and I want him.
That's the truth!"
On these thoughts, which attracted her to the point where she stopped even thinking about her situation, she was caught stopping at the porch of her home.
When she saw the doorman facing her, she just remembered sending a note and a telegram.
'Is there an answer?' 'She asked.'
'I will now look,' answered the doorman and, looking at the office, took out and gave her a square, thin envelope of the telegram.
"I can't be here till ten o'clock. Wronsky," she read.
'Didn't the messenger come back?
'No,' answered the doorman.
"And if so, I know what to do," she said, and when she felt an uncertain anger and a need for revenge, she ran upstairs. 'I will go to him myself.
Before I leave forever, I'll tell him everything.
I've never hated anyone as much as this man!" 'I thought she did.'
When she saw his hat on the rack, she freaked out.
She did not realize that his telegram was the answer to her telegram and that he had not yet received her note.
She now imagined him to be calmly speaking to her mother and to Forty and her joyous suffering.
"Yeah, I have to go faster," she said to herself, not knowing where to go yet.
She wanted to get away from the feelings she felt in this terrible house.
The servants, the walls, the things in this house -- everything in it caused disgust and anger, and put pressure on it with some weight.
"Yeah, we should go to the railway station, and if we don't, we should go there and find him."
Anna looked at the train schedule in the papers.
She leaves at eight o'clock tonight for two minutes.
"Yeah, I'll catch up."
She told me to lay down the other horses and put the stuff in the road bag for a few days.
She knew she wouldn't come back here anymore.
She was confused about the plans that came to her mind, and what happens there at the station or in the Countess's name, she's gonna go down the Nizhegorod road to the first city and stay there.
Lunch stood on the table; she came up, sniffed bread and cheese, and made sure that the smell of everything she ate was disgusting, she told me to serve the stroller, and came out.
The house had already cast a shadow across the street, and it was a clear, still warm evening in the sun.
And Annushka, who walked her with her things, and Peter, who put things in a wheelchair, and the coachman, apparently displeased, were all disgusted with her and annoyed her with his words and his movements.
'I don't need you, Peter.
'What about the ticket?'
'Well, whatever you want, I don't care,' she said with shame.
Peter jumped up on the goats and, when he was anxious, ordered him to go to the train station.
"Here she is again!
"I understand everything again," said Anna, "as soon as the stroller touched and shoved on a small bridge, one after the other, the impressions began to change.
"Yeah, what was the last thing I thought so well? 'She tried to remember.' 'Tutkin, coiffer?
No, it's not.
Yes, what Yashwin says: the struggle for existence and hatred is one thing that connects people.
No, you're going in vain,' she approached the company in the foursome, which apparently was going to have fun out of town. 'And the dog you're bringing with you will not help you.'
You're not gonna get away with this."
Looking the way Peter turned, she saw a half-dead factory with a rocking head that she was taking somewhere in the city.
"This one -- more like," she thought. 'I did not find that pleasure either with Count Vronski, even though I expected much of him.'
And Anna turned now, for the first time, the bright light in which she saw everything, her relationship with him, which she had previously avoided thinking about.
"What was he looking for in me?
Love is not so much the satisfaction of vanity."
She remembered his words, the look on his face, reminiscent of a humble cop dog, at the very first time they were connected.
And now it's all confirmed.
"Yes, it was a triumph of vain success.
Of course, there was love, but there was a great deal of pride in success.
He bragged about me.
Now it's over.
There's nothing to be proud of.
Not to be proud, to be ashamed.
He took everything he could from me, and now he doesn't need me.
He weighs heavily on me and tries not to be dishonest about me.
He talked yesterday -- he wants a divorce and a marriage to burn his ships.
He loves me -- but how?
The zest is gone.
'This one wants to surprise everyone and is very pleased with herself,' she thought, looking at a blazing orderman riding a manger horse. 'Yes, that taste is not in me.
If I leave him, he'll be happy deep down."
That was not an assumption, &quot; she clearly saw it in the piercing light that now gave her the meaning of life and human relations.
"My love keeps getting hotter and more loving, and it's all going to go out and go out, and that's why we're breaking up," she kept thinking. 'And you can't help it.
It's all the same to me, and I demand that more and more of it be given to me.
And he wants more and more to leave me.
It's just that we've gone to contact, and then we're inexorably apart. And you can't change that.
He tells me that I'm senselessly jealous, and I've told myself that I'm pointlessly jealous; but that's not true.
I'm not jealous, and I'm not happy.
But... 'She opened her mouth and moved in a wheelchair because of the excitement she had suddenly had in her mind. 'If I could be anything other than a mistress who is passionately fond of his caress; but I cannot and do not want to be anything else.'
And with this desire, I make him disgust, and he's angry with me, and it can't be different.
Don't I know that he wouldn't lie to me, that he has no view of 40, that he's not in love with Kitty, that he wouldn't cheat on me?
I know all this, but it doesn't make me feel any better.
If he does not love me, because of duty he is kind, gentle to me, and because of what I want, it is a thousand times worse than even anger!
This is hell!
That's what this is.
He hasn't loved me in a long time.
And where love ends, there's hatred.
I don't know these streets at all.
There's mountains, and everyone's at home, at home...
And all the people in the houses, people...
How many of them there is no end, and everyone hates each other.
Well, let me think of something I want to be happy about. Well?
I'm getting a divorce, Alexis Alexandrovich is giving me Serezha, and I'm getting married to Vronsky."
When she thought of Alexe Alexandrovich, she immediately pictured him as a living person, before herself, with his mild, dead, dead eyes, blue veins on white hands, intonations, and coarse fingers, and when she remembered the feeling that was between them, and that was also called love, she shuddered from disgust.
"Well, I'm gonna get a divorce and I'm gonna be the wife of Wronski.
So Kitty's gonna stop looking at me the way she looked at me today?
Nope.
Is Serezha gonna stop asking or thinking about my two husbands?
What's the new feeling I'm gonna come up with between me and Wronski?
Is there any way that happiness can be no longer but torment?
No and no!" she said to herself now without any hesitation. 'Impossible!
We split up our lives, and I do his misery, he's mine, and neither can I.
All attempts have been made, the screw has swerved.
Yeah, the beggar with the baby.
She thinks she's pathetic.
Aren't we all thrown into the world just to hate each other and to torment ourselves and others?
The hymnists are coming, they're laughing.
Serezha? 'She remembered.' 'I thought I loved him, too, and I was sorry for my tenderness.
And I lived without him, and I traded him for another love, and I didn't complain about that trade until I was satisfied with that love."
And she repulsedly remembered what she called that love.
And the clarity with which she now saw her life and all the people made her happy.
"So have I, and Peter, and Fedor's coach, and this merchant, and all the people who live there on the Volga, where they invite these ads, everywhere and always," she thought, when she had already come to the low building of the Lower City Station and she was approached by the architects.
'Will you order me before the Screaming?' 'Peter said.'
She completely forgot where and why she was going, and only with great effort could she understand the question.
'Yes,' she said to him, giving him a wallet with money, and, with a little red bag in her hand, she came out of the wheelchair.
Coming between the crowd in the first class room, she briefly remembered all the details of her situation and the solutions between which she hesitated.
Again, the hope, the despair at the old, sick places, began to poison the wounds of her tormented, apprehensive heart.
Sitting on the star-shaped couch waiting for the train, she thought with disgust at those who entered and left (all of them hated her), about how she would arrive at the station, write him a note, and what she would write to him, about how he was now complaining to his mother (not understanding her suffering) about her position, and how she would enter the room, and what she would say to him.
She was thinking about how life could still be happy, how painfully she loved and hated him, and how scary her heart beats.
There was a call, some young men passing through, ugly, arrogant and hasty, and together paying attention to the impression they had made; and Peter went through the hall in his liquor and barblets, with a dumb animal's face, and approached her to escort her to the wagon.
Noisy men quieted when she walked past them on the platform, and one whispered something about her to the other, of course something nasty.
She went up to the high step and sat alone in a compartment on a springy, once white couch. The bag, flickering on the springs, calmed down.
Peter raised his gallon hat by the window with a stupid smile, and the arrogant conductor slammed the door and tickled it.
The lady, ugly, with the tournament (Anna mentally divided this woman and horrified her deformity), and the girl, indirectly laughing, ran downstairs.
'Caterina Andreevna, she has everything, ma tante! 'The girl screamed.'
"The girl -- and she's disfigured and crooked," Anna thought.
In order not to see anyone, she quickly stood up and sat down to the opposite window in an empty wagon.
A dirty, ugly man in a hat, with his hair stuck in it, walked past this window, bent over to the wheels of the car.
"Something familiar with this ugly man," Anna thought.
And when she remembered her dream, she freaked out to the opposite door.
The conductor opened the door by letting his husband in with his wife.
'Would you like to go out?'
Anna didn't answer.
The conductor and those who came in didn't notice the horror on her face under the veil.
She went back to her corner and sat down.
Chet sat down on the opposite side, carefully, but secretly looking around her dress.
Both husband and wife seemed disgusting to Anna.
The husband asked if she would allow her to smoke, obviously not to smoke, but to talk to her.
After receiving her consent, he spoke to his wife in French about the fact that he had to speak even less than to smoke.
They talked, pretending, stupid, just to make her hear.
Anna clearly saw how they were bothering each other and how much they hated each other.
And you shouldn't have hated such pathetic freaks.
A second call was heard, followed by the movement of luggage, noise, screaming and laughter.
Anna was so clear that there was nothing to be happy about, that that laughter was annoying to her pain, and she wanted to shut her ears so she wouldn't hear him.
Finally, a third call was made, a whistle was whistled, a squealing of the sailor, the chain broke, and the husband crossed over.
'It would be interesting to ask him what he meant by this,' thought Anna with an angry look at him.
She looked past the lady through the window at exactly the same thing as the backsliding people who were driving the train and standing on the platform.
The train car that Anna was sitting in, the car that drove past the platform, the stone wall, the disc, past other wagons; the wheels were smoother and more oily; the wheels sounded lightly on the rails, the window was lit by a bright evening sun, and the breeze was played with a curtain.
Anna forgot about her neighbors in the car and, on a light ride, breathed fresh air into her body, she began to think again.
"Yeah, where was I?
It's that I can't come up with a situation where life isn't torture, that we're all made to suffer, and that we all know it and we all come up with the means to deceive ourselves.
And when you see the truth, what will you do?"
'The mind has been given to man to get rid of what is bothering him,' said the French lady, apparently content with her phrase and made-up.
It's like Anna said it.
"To get rid of what's bothering me," Anna repeated.
And when she looked at the red - cheeked husband and the skinny wife, she realized that a painful wife considered herself to be an incomprehensible woman, and the husband deceived her and supported her in that view of herself.
It's like Anna saw their story and all the shacks of their souls, putting the light on them.
But there was nothing interesting about it, and she kept thinking.
"Yeah, it really bothers me, and it gives me reason to get rid of it, so I guess I gotta get rid of it.
Why don't you put out the candle when you're not looking at anything else when you're looking at it?
But how?
Why did this conductor run through the ventricle, why are they yelling, these young men in that car?
Why are they telling me why they're laughing?
It's not true, it's all lies, it's all lies, it's all evil!"
When the train approached the station, Anna went out into a crowd of other passengers and, like the lepers, stopped on the platform, trying to remember why she had come here and what she was going to do.
Everything she thought was possible before was now so difficult to understand, especially in the noisy crowd of all these ugly people who left her alone.
The artists ran up to her and offered her their services; then the young men, knocking heels on the platform boards and talking loudly, looking over her, turned away from her in the wrong direction.
When she remembered that she wanted to go further, if there was no answer, she stopped an artifact and asked if there was a punter with a note to Count Wronsky.
'The Count of Vronski?'
They were here right now. We met Princess Forty with her daughter.
What kind of coachman is he?
While she was talking to the painter, Michaela's cooper, brown, funny, in the blue patio and chain, apparently proud that he had performed the assignment so well, approached her and gave her a note.
She printed it, and her heart was crumbled before she read it.
"I'm sorry the note didn't catch me.
"I will be at ten o'clock," he wrote with a careless handwriting.
"That's it! I've been waiting for this!" 'She said to herself with an evil laugh.'
'Okay, go home,' she said quietly, turning to Michaela.
She spoke quietly because the speed of heartbeat prevented her from breathing.
"No, I won't let you torture yourself," she thought, threatening not him, not herself, but the one who made her suffer, and walking over the platform by the station.
Two maids walking on the platform turned their heads back looking at her, thinking out loud about her toilet, "The real ones," they said about the lace she was wearing.
Young people didn't leave her alone.
They again, looking in her face and laughing at something that wasn't natural, passed by.
The station manager asked if she was coming.
The boy, the kwasa salesman, kept an eye on her.
"Oh, my God, where am I going?" --and went further and further on the platform, she thought.
She stopped at the end.
Ladies and children who met the master in glasses and laughed loudly and spoke, shut up, looking back at her when she was even with them.
It accelerated the step and moved away from them to the edge of the platform.
The freight train was coming.
The platform was shaking, and she thought she was coming again.
And all of a sudden, when she remembered the crushed man on the day of her first meeting with Wronski, she realized what she had to do.
A quick, easy step down the steps from the water pump to the rails, she stopped near her passing train.
She looked at the bottom of the wagons, the screws and chains, and the high iron wheels of the slow-rolling first wagon and the eyemaker tried to determine the middle between the front and rear wheels and the minute the midway was against her.
"That way!" she said to herself, looking in the shade of the car, at the coal-flagged sand that had been sunk by the spals -- that way, in the middle, and I will punish him and get rid of everyone and myself."
She wanted to fall into the middle of the first car. But the red bag she took off her hand delayed her, and it was too late: the middle passed her.
I should've waited for the next car.
A feeling like the one she felt when she was bathing, preparing to enter the water, covered her, and she crossed over.
The usual gesture of God's sign caused a series of girls' and children's memories in her soul, and suddenly the darkness that covered her was torn apart, and life appeared to her for a moment with all her bright past joys.
But she kept an eye on the wheels of a suitable second car. And just as the middle between the wheels was leveled with her, she threw a red bag away and, by shoving her head into her shoulders, fell under the car on her arms and light motion, as if ready to get up immediately, she fell down on her knees.
And at the same moment, she was terrified of what she was doing.
"Where am I?
What am I doing?
Why?"
She wanted to get up, tossed away; but something huge, inexorable pushed her into the head and dragged her behind her back.
"My Lord, forgive me all!" 'She spoke, feeling impossible to fight.'
The man, in sentencing something, was working on iron.
And the candle, when she read a book filled with anxiety, deception, sorrow, and evil, came forth brighter than ever, with light, lit up all that was before in the darkness, blazed, frowned, and blackened out forever.
PART EIGHTH
It's been almost two months.
It was half a hot summer, and Sergei Ivanovic was just about to leave Moscow.
In the life of Koznyshev, events took place during that time.
A year ago, his book, the fruit of six years of work, entitled "Experience of the review of fundamentals and forms of statehood in Europe and Russia", was completed.
Some sections of this book and the introduction were printed in temporary publications, and other parts were read by Sergei Ivanovic to his people, so that the ideas of this essay could not be the perfect news for the public; yet Sergei Ivanovic expected that his book, by its appearance, would make a serious impression on society and, if not a revolution in science, in any case, a great deal of excitement in the scientific world.
This book, after careful editing, was published last year and distributed to book-sellers.
Without asking anyone about it, reluctantly and indifferently responding to their friends' questions about how his book goes, without even asking the bookkeepers how it is bought, Sergei Ivanovic, watched with intense attention, following the first impression that his book would make in society and in literature.
But a week later, another, third, and there was no visible impression in society; his friends, specialists, and scientists, sometimes apparently out of courtesy, talked about her. The rest of his acquaintances, however, did not talk to him about it without interested in the scientific book.
And in society, especially now occupied by others, there was complete indifference.
In the literature, too, there was no word about the book during the month.
Sergei Ivanovic was counting on the time needed to write the review, but a month later, another, was the same silence.
It was only in "North Bug" in the joke feleton about the singer Drabanti, who had slept out of the voice, that a few contemptible words were said about the book of Koznyshev, which showed that the book had long been condemned by all and committed to universal ridicule.
Finally, for the third month, a critical article appeared in a serious magazine.
Koznyshev also knew the author of the article.
He met him once at Bluebow's.
The author of the article was a very young and sick feletonist, very violent as a writer, but extremely poorly educated and shy in personal relationships.
Despite his contempt for the author, Sergei Ivanovic began reading the article with full respect.
The article was awful.
Apparently, the feletonist deliberately understood the entire book in a way that was impossible to understand.
But it was so clever that for those who had not read the books (and apparently almost no one had read it), it was quite clear that the whole book was nothing more than a set of high-spouse words, and not enough of those used (which showed the question signs), and that the author of the book was a completely ignorant man.
And it was all so witty that Sergei Ivanovic himself wouldn't mind such a wit; but it was awful.
Despite the perfect good faith with which Sergei Ivanovic checked the fairness of the reviewer &apos; s arguments, he did not dwell for a moment on the shortcomings and mistakes that had been ridiculed -- it was too obvious that all of this had been done on purpose -- but immediately, involuntarily, he remembered his meeting and conversation with the author of the article.
"Did I hurt him with anything?" 'Asked Koznyshev.
And when he remembered how he corrected that young man in his ignorance at the meeting, Sergei Ivanovic found an explanation for the meaning of the article.
After this article came a dead, printed and oral silence about the book, and Sergei Ivanovic saw that his six - year - old work, developed with such love and hard work, had passed without any trace.
Koznyshev's position was even more difficult because, after completing the book, he had no more office work that had previously occupied most of his time.
Koznyshev was smart, educated, healthy, active, and did not know where to use all his activities.
Talking in the living rooms, conventions, assemblies, committees, wherever he could speak, took part in his time; but he, a longtime urban resident, did not allow himself to go into conversation, as his inexperienced brother did when he was in Moscow; there was still much leisure and mental energy left.
For his happiness, this is the most difficult time for him, due to the failure of his book, to replace the questions of the unbelievers, American friends, the Samaritan famine, the exhibitions, the spiritism, the Slavic question, which had previously only been corrupted in society, and Sergei Ivanovic, who had previously been one of the agents of the issue, all gave up to him.
Among the people to whom Koznyshev belonged, there was no other talk or writing about the Slavic issue and the Serbian war.
Anything that is done normally by an idle crowd, killing time, has now been done in favour of the Slavs. Balls, concerts, lunches, matches, ladies' dresses, beer, tracts -- everything was a sign of sympathy for the Slavs.
With many of what was said and written on this occasion, Sergei Ivanovic disagreed with the details.
He saw that the Slavic question had become one of those fashionable passions that always, in turn, served society as a subject of study; he also saw that there were many people with selfish, vain goals. I've been working on this case.
He acknowledged that the newspapers had printed a lot of unnecessary and exaggerated newspapers, with one purpose: to draw attention to themselves and to yell at others.
He saw that, with the general rise of society, all those who failed and were hurt were louder than others: commanders without armies, ministers without ministries, journalists without magazines, party leaders without guerrillas.
He saw that there was a lot of reckless and funny, but he saw and acknowledged a certain, ever-growing enthusiasm that brought together all classes of society that could not but be empathetic.
The massacre of the Slavic believers and brothers caused compassion for the suffering and anger for the oppressors.
And the heroism of Serbs and Montenegrins fighting for a great cause has given rise to a desire throughout the people to help their brothers, not by word, but by deed.
But there was another joy for Sergei Ivanovic: it was an expression of public opinion.
Society has definitely expressed its wish.
The people's soul received an expression, as Sergei Ivanovic said.
And the more he dealt with this case, the more obvious it seemed to him that it was a case that needed to be big enough to form an era.
He dedicated himself to this great work and forgot to think about his book.
He was now busy all the time, so he failed to respond to all the letters and demands addressed to him.
After working all spring and part of the summer, he was not ready to go to his brother's village until July.
He was on his way to rest for two weeks and to the most holy people, in the countryside, to enjoy the view of the rise of the people's spirit, in which he and all the people of the capital and the city were fully convinced.
Katavasov, who had long planned to fulfill Levin's promise to visit him, went with him.
As soon as Koznyshev and Katavasov arrived at the particularly busy station of the Kursk Railway, they came out of the carriage and looked at him from behind with the things of the footman, as well as the volunteers on four carts.
The ladies with the bouquets met them and, accompanied by the crowd behind them, entered the station.
One of the women who met the volunteers, leaving the room, approached Sergei Ivanovich.
'Are you here to escort me, too?' 'She asked in French.
'No, I'm on my own, Princess. Rest with my brother.
Do you always walk? 'A little smile,' said Koznyshev.
'You can't do that! 'The Princess answered. 'Isn't it true that we've already been sent eight hundred?
Malvinsky didn't believe me.
'About 800. If more than a thousand people were not sent directly from Moscow, he said.
'There you go.
That's what I said!--happy catch the lady. 'And it is true that about a million have been donated now, isn't it?
'A lot more, Princess.'
'What is the current telegram?'
They smashed the Turks again.
'Yes, I've read it,' replied Sergei Ivanovic.
They spoke of the last telegram, which confirmed that three days had been broken by the Turks at all points and that a decisive battle had been expected tomorrow.
'Oh, yeah, you know, one young man, beautiful, asked for it.
I don't know why they made it difficult.
I wanted to ask you, I know him, please write a note.
It's from Countess Lydia Ivanovna.
After asking about the details that the Princess knew about the young man who had been asked to sit, Sergei Ivanovich, in his first class, wrote a note to the one on whom it depended, and handed it to the Princess.
'You know, Count Wronsky, famous... is driving this train,' said the Princess with a triumphant and meaningful smile, when he found her again and gave her a note.
'I heard he was coming, but I didn't know when.
With this train?
'I saw him.
He's here; one mother walks him out.
That's the best he could do.
'Oh, yes, of course.
While they were talking, the crowd swam past them to the dining table.
They also moved and heard the loud voice of a gentleman who spoke to the volunteers with a glass in his hand. "To serve for faith, for humanity, for our brothers," said the lord, raising his voice. 'For a great cause, Mother Moscow blesses you.
It's alive!" 'Woe and tears,' he concluded.
Everybody screamed liveo! And a new crowd swam into the room and almost knocked the Princess down.
'Ah! Princess, what's it like? 'Great smile,' said Stepan Arkadić, suddenly appearing in the middle of the crowd. 'Didn't he say warm?'
Bravo!
And Sergei Ivanovich!
You would say this from yourself -- a few words, you know, encouragement; you are so good,' he added with a gentle, respectful and careful smile, a little by the hand of Koznyshev.
'No, I'm going now.
'Where to?
'To the village, to his brother,' said Koznyshev.
'So you will see my wife.' I wrote to her, but you'll see; please tell me that I was seen and that all right.
She'll understand.
However, tell her, would you be so kind as to appoint me as a member of the commissary's commission...
Well, she'll understand!
You know, les petites misseres de la vie humaine -- as if apologizing, he turned to the Princess. 'And soft, not Lisa, but Bibish, who sends a thousand guns and twelve sisters.'
Did I tell you?
'Yes, I heard,' answered Koznyshev reluctantly.
'It is a pity that you are leaving,' said Stepan Arkadić. 'Tomorrow we give lunch to two departureers -- Dimer-Bartnyansky from Petersburg and our Veselovsky, Grisha.
They're both coming.
Veselovsky recently got married.
Good for you!
Isn't that right, Princess? 'He turned to the lady.'
The Princess, without answering, looked at Koznyshev.
But the fact that Sergei Ivanovic and the Princess were trying to get rid of him didn't embarrass Stepan Arkadych at all.
He smiled and looked at the Princess's feather, and he looked on the sides like he was remembering something.
When he saw the lady with the mug, he called her to his house and put in a five - chunk piece of paper.
'I cannot see these mugs calmly as long as I have the money,' he said. 'What's the current problem?
Good for the Montenegrins!
'What are you saying!' he cried when the princess told him he was going on that train.
For a moment, Stepan Arkadyić's face expressed sadness, but a moment later, when he was slightly distraught on each leg and circling the buckenbards, he entered the room where Vronski was, Stepan Arkadić had already completely forgotten his desperate tears over his sister's body and saw only a hero and an old friend in Vronsk.
'With all his faults, you must not fail to give him justice,' said Princess Sergei Ivanovich, as soon as Oblonsky had departed from them. 'That's exactly the Russian, the Slavic nature!
Only I'm afraid it's gonna hurt to see him.
Whatever you say, I'm touched by the fate of this man.
Talk to him dearly,' said the Princess.
'Yes, maybe if I have to.'
'I never loved him.
But it buys a lot.
He's not only on his own, but he's keeping the squadron to himself.
'Yes, I heard.
I heard a call.
Everyone's pushed to the door.
'Here he is!' said the princess, pointing to him, in a long coat and in black, with broad fields of a hat coming under her arm with her mother.
The Oblonian was walking beside him, something lively to say.
When he frowned, he looked before him as if he had not heard what Stepan Arkadych had said.
Perhaps, at Oblonski's direction, he looked back in the direction where the Princess and Sergei Ivanovic stood and raised his hat silently.
His older and suffering face seemed fossilized.
When he reached the platform, he left his mother silently, and fled to the train station.
God gave up on the platform, keep the king, and then yell: Yay! And alive!
One of the volunteers, a tall, very young man with boobs, was especially bowing over his head with a whip hat and a bouquet.
After him, two officers and an elderly man with a big beard, bowed in a saloon hat, too.
After saying goodbye to the Princess, Sergei Ivanovic, along with Katavasov, came into a bus full of cars, and the train was moved.
At the Caesarian station, the train was met by a slender choir of young people singing, "Thank you."
Once again, the volunteers bowed and leaned, but Koznyshev ignored them; he had so many dealings with the volunteers that he already knew their common type, and that was not of interest to him.
Katavasov, on the other hand, did not have occasion to observe volunteers after his academic studies and was very interested in them and asked about them by Sergei Ivanovic.
Koznyshev advised him to go to second grade to talk to them himself.
At the next station, Katavasov complied with this advice.
At the first stop, he moved to second grade and met volunteers.
They sat in the corner of the car, talking loudly and apparently knowing that the passengers and Katavasov who came in were drawing attention to them.
The young man spoke louder than anyone.
He was obviously drunk and he was telling me about some story that happened in their establishment.
An officer in the Austrian military uniform was sitting in front of him.
He smiled and listened to the storyteller and stopped him.
The third one, in an artillery uniform, sat on a suitcase next to them.
The fourth one was asleep.
In a conversation with the young men, Katavasov learned that he was a wealthy Moscow merchant who was running a large fortune until he was twenty - two years old.
He did not like Katavasov because he was weak, spoiled, and ill; he was apparently convinced, especially now, that he was doing a hero thing and boasted in the most unpleasant way.
Another retired officer also made an unpleasant impression on Katavasov.
It was obviously the man who tried everything.
He was both on the railway, and on the manager, and on his own, he started factories, and he spoke of everything, without need or need, by using the words of scientists.
Third, the artilleryist, on the other hand, really liked Katavasov.
It was a modest, quiet man who clearly bowed to the knowledge of a retired guard and to the heroic sacrifice of a merchant and himself who spoke nothing of himself.
When Katavasov asked him what motivated him to go to Serbia, he humbled himself:
'Well, everyone's on their way.
We need to help the Serbs, too.
Too bad.
'Yes, especially your artilleryists, there are few,' said Katavasov.
'Cause I was in the artillery for a short time; maybe they'll be in the infantry or cavalry.
'How is infantry when artillery players are most needed?' 'Katawasov said, thinking for years that he should be in a significant position.
'I didn't serve much in artillery, I was a retired junior,' he said, and began to explain why he couldn't pass the exam.
All of this made an unpleasant impression on Katavasova together, and when the volunteers went out to the station for a drink, Katavasov wanted to believe that he had a bad impression.
One passing old man in a military coat listened to Katavasov's conversation with volunteers all the time, leaving him alone, Katavasov turned to him.
'Yes, the diversity of the provisions of all these people going there,' said Katavasov in an uncertain manner, seeking to express their views and, at the same time, to learn the views of the old man.
The old man was a military man who did two campaigns.
He knew what a military man was, and by the look and conversation of these gentlemen, the way they used to stick to the flask, he thought they were bad military.
In addition, he was a resident of a county town, and he wanted to tell us how a soldier, a drunkard and a thief, had left his town, and no one had taken him to work.
But, in his experience, knowing that in the current public mood it was dangerous to express an opinion that was opposed to a common one, and in particular to condemn volunteers, he also looked for Katavasova. 'Well, that's where people are needed. They say Serbian officers aren't good for anything.
'Oh, yes, and these will be lizies,' said Katavasov, laughing with his eyes.
And they talked about the latest military news, and they both covered up their perplexity about who was expected to be fought tomorrow when the Turks, according to the latest news, were broken up at all points.
So, both of them did not express their opinion, and they differed.
Katavasov, who entered his car involuntarily twisting his soul, told Sergei Ivanovich his observations about the volunteers, which showed that they were great guys.
At a large station in the city, the singing and screaming of volunteers met again, and the assemblers and assemblers came again with the mugs, and the ladies of the city brought the bouquets to the volunteers and followed them to the buffet; but all this was already much weaker and smaller than in Moscow.
During the stop in the city of Paris, Sergei Ivanovic did not go to the buffet, but went back and forth on the platform.
The first time he walked past the office of Vronski, he noticed that the window had been wrapped up.
But another time, he saw an old Countess by the window.
She's called to her home.
'Here's the food, I'll walk him to Kursk,' she said.
'Yes, I heard,' said Koznyshev, stopping by her window and looking into it. 'What a beautiful line on his part!' he added, noting that he had not been in the ward.
'What was he supposed to do after his misfortune?'
'What a terrible event! 'Oh, Koznyshev said.'
'Oh, what I've been through!
Come on in...
Oh, what I've been through! 'She repeated when Koznyshev came in and sat next to her on the couch. 'That can't be imagined!
Six weeks he didn't talk to anyone and only ate when I begged him.
And I couldn't leave him alone for a minute.
We took everything he could have killed himself; we lived in the lower floor, but we couldn't have foreseen anything.
'Cause, you know, he's already fired once because of her,' she said, and the old lady's eyebrows frowned at the memory. 'Yes, she came, just like a woman like that was supposed to come.'
Even death, she chose a sneaky, low one.
'It is not for us to judge, Countess,' said Sergei Ivanovic with a sigh, 'but I understand how hard it was for you.
'Oh, don't tell me!
I lived in my name, and I had it.
They're bringing you a note.
He wrote the answer and sent it away.
We didn't know she was at the station right away.
Tonight, I just went to my place, and my Mary tells me that at the station, the lady threw herself under the train.
I've been hit by something! I realized it was her.
The first thing I said was not to tell him.
But they already told him.
Bugger was there, and he saw everything.
When I ran into his room, he wasn't his own -- it was scary to look at him.
He didn't say a word and went there.
I don't know what it was, but he was brought as a dead man.
I wouldn't recognize him.
"Prostration complete," said the doctor.
Then it was almost rabies. 'Oh, what to say!' said the Countess, waving her hand. 'A terrible time!
No, no matter what you say, you bad woman.
Well, what kind of passion is that?
It's all something special to prove.
So she proved it.
Two fine men, their husband and my poor son, also lost their lives.
'What about her husband? 'Ask Koznyshev.'
'He took her daughter.
Alesha agreed to everything at first.
But now he's terribly tormented that he gave a stranger his daughter.
But he can't take the word back.
Karenine came to the funeral. But we tried not to see Alesha.
It's easier for him, for his husband.
She untied him.
But my poor son gave up all over her.
Dropped everything-- career, me, and then she didn't feel sorry for him yet, and she killed him on purpose.
No, no matter what you say, her death is the worst death of a woman without religion.
Forgive me God, but I can't help hating her memory by looking at her son's death.
'But now how is he?'
'God has helped us -- this Serbian war.
I'm an old man, I don't understand it, but God sent it to him.
Of course, I'm scared as a mother; and most importantly, they say, ce n'est pas tres bien vu a Petersbourg.
But what to do!
One thing could lift him up.
Yashwin -- his buddy -- he lost everything and went to Serbia.
He stopped by and talked him into it.
It's him now.
Please talk to him, I want to entertain him.
He's so sad.
He's got teeth all over his ass.
He'll be very happy to see you.
Please talk to him, he's walking this way.
Koznyshev said he was very happy and moved on to the other side of the train.
In the evening shadow of the necklace on the platform, he walked 20 feet fast in his long coat and his hat, with his hands in his pockets, walking like a beast in a cage.
Koznyshev seemed to see him when he approached, but pretended to be invisible.
Sergei Ivanovic didn't care.
He was above all the personal accounts with Vronski.
At that moment, in the eyes of Sergei Ivanovich, he was an important figure for the great cause, and Koznishev felt it was his duty to encourage and approve it.
He approached him.
He stopped, looked, learned, and, after taking a few steps towards Sergei Ivanovic, shook his hand firmly.
'Maybe you didn't want to see me,' said Sergei Ivanovic, 'but can I help you?
'I can't be as uncomfortable with anyone as I am with you,' he said. 'Excuse me.
I'm not happy in my life.
'I understand and wanted to offer you my services,' said Koznyshev, looking at the obvious suffering face of Vronski. 'Do you need a letter to Ristic, Milan?
'Oh, no! 'It was as if he could hardly understand,' said Vronsky. 'If you don't care, you'll walk.
There's such a spirit in the cars.
A letter?
No, thank you; no recommendation is needed to die.
Some for the Turks...' he said, smiling with one mouth.
The eyes continued to have an angry and painful expression.
'Yes, but it may be easier for you to have the kind of communication you need, with someone who is prepared.'
Whatever you want.
I'm very glad to hear about your decision.
And so many attacks on volunteers that a man like you raises them in public opinion.
'I am, as a man,' he said, 'and it is good that life is worth nothing to me. And that the physical energy in me is enough to get into the karya and smudge or lie down -- I know that.
I'm glad there's something to give my life, which I don't want, but I'm ashamed of.
Someone's gonna need it. 'And he made the impatience of the motion of the cheekbone with the constant, painful tooth, which prevented him even from speaking with the expression with which he wanted.
'You will be reborn, I predict to you,' said Koznyshev, feeling touched. 'The removal of their brothers from the yoke is a goal worthy of death and life.
Give you the god of success of the outside -- and of the inner world -- he added and extended his hand.
The hand of Sergei Ivanovich was cluttered firmly.
'Yes, as a weapon, I can do anything.
But as a human being, I am a wreck,' he said in a position.
The stinging pain of a strong tooth, filling his mouth with salivation, prevented him from speaking. He shut up, staring at the wheels slowly and smoothly on the tracks of the tender.
And all of a sudden, it's not the pain, it's the general excruciating internal awkwardness that made him forget for a moment his toothache. When looking at the tender and the rails, under the influence of a conversation with a friend whom he did not meet after his misfortune, he suddenly remembered her, that is, what remained of her, when he, like a madman, ran into the railway station barracks: on the table of the barracks, shamelessly stretched in the midst of someone else &apos; s bloodied body, full of a recent life; a leftover head with her heavy ears and curling hair in the temples, and a lovely face, with a half-open ripple mouth, frozen weird, pathetic in the lips, and terrible in the stopped open eyes, an expression, as if to say that scary word -- that he would repent -- that she had told him during the fight.
And he tried to remember her the way she was when he first met her, too, at the station, mysterious, charming, loving, seeking and giving happiness, not the cruel, vindictive way that she remembered at the last minute.
He tried to remember the best moments with her, but those moments were always poisoned.
He remembered it only as a triumphant, completed threat to no one of the needless but unearthable repentance.
He stopped feeling toothache, and sobbing distorted his face.
When he passed by two times in silence under the necks and took possession of himself, he quietly turned to Sergei Ivanovic:
'Did you have any telegrams after yesterday?'
Yeah, it's the third time, but it's gonna be a decisive battle tomorrow.
And when they talked about the proclamation of Milan as King and the enormous consequences that it could have, they split their cars after the second call.
Without knowing when he would be allowed to leave Moscow, Sergei Ivanovic did not telegraph his brother to return for him. Levin was not at home when Katavasov and Sergei Ivanovic, on a tarantasic taken at the station, dusted like an arapy, drove up to the porch of the pavilion house at the twelfth hour of the day.
Kitty, sitting on the balcony with her father and sister, recognized the brother-in-law and ran downstairs to meet him.
'It is no shame for you not to let me know,' she said, giving her hand to Sergei Ivanovich and giving him a forehead.
'We made a good trip and did not bother you,' replied Sergei Ivanovic. 'I'm so dusty, I'm afraid to touch.
I was so busy, I didn't know when I was gonna get out.
And you are old-fashioned,' he said, smiling, 'you enjoy quiet happiness beyond currents in your quiet sank.
There's our buddy Fedor Vasilić at last.
'But I am not a nigger, I wash myself,' said Katavasov with his usual humour, giving up his hand and smiling with particularly brilliant teeth because of the black face.
'Kostya will be very pleased.
He fucked up.
It's time for him to come.
'All is in charge of the housekeeping.'
This is exactly in the sundown,' said Katavasov. 'And we can see nothing in the city except the Serbian war.
Well, how does my buddy feel?
Isn't it human?
'He is so, nothing like everyone else,' replied Kitty, looking at Sergei Ivanovic in a somewhat confused manner. 'That's how I'm gonna send for him.
My dad's here.
He just arrived from abroad.
And when she had arranged to send for Levin and to have dusted guests wash themselves, one into the office, the other into the large doll of the room, and breakfast for the guests, she took advantage of the fast movements she had been deprived of during her pregnancy, and ran to the balcony.
'This is Sergei Ivanovich and Katavasov, Professor,' she said.
'Oh, the heat is heavy! 'The prince said.'
'No, Dad, he's very sweet, and Kostya loves him very much,' said Kitty, begging him for something, smiling at him, covering the expression of ridicule on her father's face.
'I am nothing.'
'You come, sweetheart, to them,' said Kitty to his sister, 'and borrow them.'
They saw Steve at the station, he's healthy.
I'm gonna run to Mitha.
I haven't fed it since the tea.
Now he's awake and he's screaming. 'And when she felt milk pouring, she took a quick step into the nursery.'
She did not know the difference between her and her child, but she recognized his lack of food by the tide of milk.
She knew he was screaming before she came to the nursery.
And indeed, he was screaming.
She heard his voice and stepped up.
But the sooner she walked, the louder he screamed.
The voice was good, healthy, only hungry and impatient.
'How long has it been, nanny? 'Hurryly said Kitty, sitting on a chair and preparing herself for feeding.' 'Give it to me quickly. Oh, nanny, you're boring, you know, you're gonna tie your cap.
The child was torn up by a greedy scream.
'You can't, Mother,' said Agatha Mikhaylovna, who was almost always in the nursery. 'We have to clean it up.'
Agu, agu! 'She sang over him, ignoring her mother.
The nanny carried the baby to her mother. Agatha Mikhaylovna followed him with a tender face.
'He knows, he knows.
Believe God, Mother Katerina Alexandrovna, recognize me! 'Screaming Agatha Mikhaylovna's baby.
But Kitty didn't listen to what she said.
Her impatience was as growing as her child's impatience.
The impatience of the matter could not be resolved for a long time.
The baby grabbed the wrong one and got angry.
Finally, after a desperate, suffocating scream, an empty suffocation, the matter was settled, and the mother and child both felt calm and quiet.
'But he too, poor thing, is sweaty,' said Kitty whispering, feeling the child. 'Why do you think he will find out?' 'She added, touching the pluto, as she thought, the baby's eyes staring from under the skull, the equally swollen cheeks, and his pen with the red palm, which he made round motion.'
'No way!
If I did, Kitty would recognize me,' said Agatha Mikhaylovna for approval, and smiled.
She smiled that although she said he couldn't find out, she knew in her heart that not only did he recognize Agatha Mikhaylovna, but that he knew and understood everything, and that he knew and understood a lot more that no one knew and that she, her mother, knew and understood only because of him.
For Agatha Mikhaylovna, for the nanny, for the grandfather, even Mitha had a living creature for his father, requiring only material care; but for his mother, he had long been a moral creature with whom there had already been a whole history of spiritual relations.
'He will wake up, God will give, you will see.'
As soon as I do, he'll shine, love.
It will shine like a bright day,' said Agatha Mikhaylovna.
'Well, well, well, then let's see,' whispered Kitty. 'Now go, he is falling asleep.
Agatha Michailovna went out on the chicks; the nanny let down the store, kicked the flies out of the casket of the crib and the hornet on the window of the frame, and sat down, waving the birch branch over the mother and the child.
'It's hot, it's hot!
I wish God had given me rain,' she said.
'Yeah, yeah, shh...' answered Kitty with a little bit of a shake and a little bit of a touch, as if a brush-clicked, swollen pen, with which Mitya was all waving, closing her eyes, opening her eyes.
This pen embarrassed Kitty: she wanted to kiss that pen, but she was afraid to do it so she wouldn't wake up the baby.
The pen finally stopped moving, and the eyes closed.
Only occasionally, while continuing his work, the child, raising his long, bent eyelashes, looked at his mother in the middle of the day with his seemingly black, damp eyes.
The nanny stopped waving and fell asleep.
From the top, I heard the voice of the old prince and the laugh of Katavasov.
'That's right, they talked without me,' thought Kitty, 'but it's a shame that Bones isn't here.
That's right, I went back to the beekeeper.
It's sad, though, that he's often there, but I'm glad.
It's entertaining him.
Now he's more fun and better than spring.
'Cause he was so dark and so tormented, I was scared for him.
And how funny he is!" 'She whispered, smiling.'
She knew she was tormenting her husband.
It was his disbelief.
Even though if she had been asked if she had thought that he would be destroyed in the Hereafter, she would have agreed that he would be destroyed. His disbelief did not make her regret; and she, who acknowledged that there could be no salvation for an unbeliever, and loved her husband's soul more than anything in the world, thought of his disbelief and said to herself that he was funny.
"Why does he keep reading philosophy for a year? - she thought. 'If this is all written in these books, he can understand them.'
If it's not true, why read it?
He himself says he'd like to believe.
So why doesn't he believe?
Right, because he thinks a lot?
He thinks a lot of privacy.
All one, one.
We can't talk to him.
I think these guests will please him, especially Katavasov.
'He likes to reason with him,' she thought, and immediately moved to a place where Katavasov could sleep, either separately or together with Sergei Ivanov.
And then suddenly she had a thought that made her freak out and even bothered Mith, who looked at her for it.
"The maid doesn't seem to have brought any underwear yet, and for the guests, the bed linens are all wasted.
If not ordered, Agafya Mikhaylovna will give Sergei Ivanich a stale underwear, &quot; and one thought of it, the blood threw into Kitty &apos; s face.
"Yeah, I'm gonna take care of it," she decided, and when she went back to her old mind, she remembered that something important hadn't been thought out yet, and she remembered that.
"Yes, Kostya is not a believer," she remembered with a smile again.
"Well, you unbeliever!
Let him always be like Madame Stahl or whatever I wanted to be abroad.
No, he won't pretend anymore."
And the recent feature of his kindness was living in front of her.
Two weeks ago, a penetrating letter was received from Stepan Arkadyić to Dolly.
He begged her to save his honor, sell her property to pay his debts.
Dolly was desperate, hated her husband, despised, regretted, decided to divorce, refused, but ended up agreeing to sell part of her property.
After that, Kitty remembered her husband's confusion, his repeated awkward approach to his case, and how he finally came up with a single remedy, without insulting her, to help Dolly, offered Kitty to give her a piece of her name, something she had never figured out before.
"What a disbeliever is he?
With his heart, with that fear of hurting someone, even the child!
Anything for others, nothing for yourself.
Sergei Ivanovic still thinks it's Kosti &apos; s duty to be his commander. So is the sister.
Now Dolly and the kids are in his custody.
All these men who come to him every day as if he had to serve them."
"Yeah, but be like your father, only like this," she said, passing Mitha to the nanny and touching his cheek with her lip.
From the moment when Levin saw his beloved dying brother for the first time looking at the questions of life and death through what he called them, beliefs that were invisible to him, between twenty and thirty-four years, replaced his childhood and youth beliefs -- he was terrified not so much of death, but of life without the slightest knowledge of where, why, why, and what it was.
The body, the destruction of it, the inexorability of matter, the law of preservation of strength, development -- were the words that replaced his previous faith. These and related concepts were very good for intellectual purposes; but they did not give anything for life, and Levin suddenly felt the position of a man who would trade a warm coat for a kite, and who, for the first time in the cold, would certainly not reason, but would be convinced by his whole being that he was still naked and that he was bound to die painfully.
From that moment on, although not paying attention to himself and still living, Levin continued to feel that fear for his ignorance.
Moreover, he felt vaguely that what he called his beliefs was not only ignorance, but that it was a warehouse of thought in which it was impossible to know what he needed.
The first time of marriage, the new joys and responsibilities that they have learned, have completely muffled these thoughts; but in recent times, after the birth of his wife, when he lived in Moscow without a cause, Levin has become increasingly and more frequent, an urgent and pressing question has become presented.
The question for him was, "If I do not accept the answers that Christianity gives to the questions of my life, what answers do I accept?"
And there's no way he could find any answers in his entire body of beliefs, not just any answers, but nothing like an answer.
He was in the position of a man looking for food in toy shops and weapons stores.
Involuntarily, unconsciously to himself, he is now in every book, in every conversation, in every person, seeking to deal with these matters and to resolve them.
More than anything else, he was surprised and disappointed that most people in his circle and age had replaced his previous beliefs with new beliefs, and had not seen any trouble in it, and had been perfectly pleased and calmed.
So, apart from the main question, Levin had other questions: Are these people sincere? Don't you think they're faking it? Or do they understand the answers given by science to questions that affect it more clearly than it does?
And he carefully studied the views of these people and the books that expressed these answers.
One thing he found since these questions began to occupy him was that he was wrong to assume, in the memory of his youthful, university circle, that religion was out of time and that it no longer existed.
All the good people in his life believed him. Both the old prince and the Lvov, who loved him so much, and Sergei Ivanov, and all the women believed, and his wife believed as he believed in his first childhood, and the ninety-nine hundred Russians, all the people whose life he had received the greatest respect, believed.
Another was that when he read many books, he found that people who shared the same views with him did not mean anything else by them, and that they, without explaining anything, merely denied those questions that he felt he could not live, but tried to solve completely different questions that were not of interest to him, such as the development of organisms, the mechanical explanation of the soul, etc.
In addition, during the birth of his wife, an extraordinary event occurred with him.
He, a disbeliever, prayed and believed the minute he prayed.
But that moment passed, and he couldn't give that mood any place in his life.
He couldn't admit that he knew the truth at the time, and now he's wrong, because once he started to think about it calmly, everything fell apart; he couldn't even admit that he was wrong at the time, because he valued the mood at the time, and in recognition of his weakness, he would have defiled those moments.
He was in a painful state of dissension with himself, and worked hard to get out of it.
They drowned him, and they tormented him more and more, but they never left him.
He read and thought, and the more he read and thought, the more he felt for his purpose.
Recently in Moscow and in the village, having found that he would not find an answer in the materialists, he reread and read back both Plato and Spinoza, and Kant, and Shelling, and Hegel, and Schopengauer, those philosophers who did not actually explain life.
His thoughts seemed fruitful when he either read or made up his own rebuttals against other teachings, especially materialistic ones; but as soon as he read or made up his own questions, the same thing always happened.
Following this definition of vague words, such as spirit, will, freedom, substance, deliberately falling into the trap of words that philosophers or he had set for himself, he began to understand something.
But it was worth forgetting the artificial course of thought and returning from life to what satisfied him when he thought, following this thread -- and all of a sudden, this artificial structure collapsed like a house of cards, and it was clear that the building was made out of the same reshuffled words, no matter what was more important in life than the mind.
For one time, while reading Chopengauer, he set up his will -- love -- and this new philosophy of the day for two, until he was removed from it, comforted him; but it also fell down when he looked at her from life, and turned out to be a kisain, unheated dress.
Brother Koznyshev advised him to read the religious writings of Hamyak.
Levin read the second volume of Homjakov's essays and, despite the poignant, elegant and witty tone that pushed him away at first, was struck in them by the teachings of the church.
At first, he was struck by the idea that divine truths were not understood by man, but by the combination of people united by love -- the church.
He was encouraged by the idea of how much easier it was to believe in an existing, now living church, comprising all the faith of men, with God at its head, and thus holy and infallible, from it to accept faith in God, creation, fall, redemption, rather than begin with God, distant, mysterious god, creation, etc.
But after reading the history of the Catholic writer's church and the history of the Orthodox writer's church, and seeing that both churches, inherently infallible, deny one another, he was disappointed in the hamjacian teaching about the church, and the building was crushed with the same ashes as philosophical structures.
All this spring, he wasn't his man, and he's been through terrible moments.
"Without knowing what I am and why I'm here, you can't live.
And I can't know, therefore I can't live." Levin said to himself.
"In infinite time, in infinity of matter, in infinite space, an organ bubble is removed, and this bubble will hold and burst, and this bubble is me."
It was a painful lie, but it was the only, final result of centuries of human thought in this direction.
It was the last faith on which all, in all industries, were built to find human thought. It was a ruling conviction, and Levin, out of all the other explanations, as clear, uninvolved, did not know exactly when and how.
But it wasn't just a lie, it was a cruel mockery of some evil force, evil, nasty and unbelievable.
I should've gotten rid of that power.
And the salvation was in everyone's hands.
I should have stopped this addiction to evil. And there was one thing -- death.
And, happy family man, a healthy man, Levin was several times so close to suicide that he hid his shoelace so that he would not hang himself on it, and feared to walk with a gun, that he might not shoot himself.
But Levin did not shoot himself, nor hang himself, and continued to live.
When Levin thought about what he was and what he was living for, he did not find an answer and came in despair; but when he stopped asking himself about it, it was as if he knew and what he was and what he lived for, because he had acted firmly and definitely and lived; even this lately, he had lived a much firmer and more precise life than before.
When he returned to the village in early June, he returned to his usual activities. The farm, the relationship with men and neighbors, the household, the affairs of his sister and brother, the relationship with his wife, family, child care, the new bee hunt he was into from this spring, took all his time.
These things did not occupy him because he justified them for some common purpose, as he had done in the past; on the contrary, now, on the one hand, disappointed by the failure of the former enterprises for the common good, on the other hand, too busy with his thoughts and the very many cases that had come upon him from all sides, he left behind absolutely every thought of the common good, and those cases occupied him only because he felt that he should have done what he had done -- that he could not have done otherwise.
Before (it began almost as a child and grew up to be completely insolent), when he tried to do something that would do good for all, for mankind, for Russia, for the whole village, he noticed that the thought of it was pleasant, but the activity itself had always been unconscionable, was not fully certain what was needed, and the activity itself, which at first seemed so big, all diminishing and diminishing, went down; but now that he had been married more and more limited to life for himself, he felt no more joy in thinking about his activities, he felt confident that his case was necessary, that it was much better than before, and that it was becoming more and more and more.
Now, clearly against his will, he went deeper and deeper into the ground, like a plow, so he couldn't get out without turning the rods.
It was no doubt necessary to live in the same way that fathers and grandparents were used to living, that is, in the same educational and child - rearing environment.
It was just as necessary as eating when you wanted to eat; and for it to be as necessary as cooking lunch, you had to drive a hardware machine in Pokrovsky so that there would be income.
As much as the debt had to be paid, it was necessary to keep the birthland in such a position that the son, having inherited it, would say the same thanks to his father, as Levin said to his grandfather for all the things he had set up and planted.
And to do that, you didn't have to give up the land, but you had to own it, you had to keep the cattle, you had to drive the fields, you had to plant the woods.
We could not help but do the work of Sergei Ivanovich, a sister, of all the men who followed counsel and were accustomed to it, and we could not abandon the child you already hold in your arms.
It was necessary to take care of the comforts of the guest sister - in - law with the children and the wife with the child, and one could not help but be with them for a small part of the day.
And all of this, along with the game hunt and the new bee hunt, filled Levin's entire life, which made no sense to him when he thought.
But besides being firmly aware of what he needed to do, Levin knew just as well how he needed to do all this and what matter was more important than another.
He knew that it was as cheap as possible to hire workers; but to take them into bondage, giving them money in advance, wasn't cheaper than they were, even though it was very profitable.
It was possible to sell straw to men without food, though they felt sorry for them; but the stable court and the drinking house, even though they had provided income, had to be destroyed.
The logging of the forests had to be collected as hard as possible, but it was not possible to take fines for the slaughtered livestock, and even though it upset the guards and destroyed fear, it was impossible not to let go of the trampled cattle.
Peter, who paid the loan shark ten percent a month, needed to borrow to buy him out; but it was not possible to let down and delay the bond to non-payer men.
It was not possible to miss the orderr that the puddle had not been cut and the grass had been lost for nothing; but it was not possible to mow the 80 tithes on which the young forest had been planted.
You couldn't forgive an employee who had gone home to work because his father had died, no matter how pathetic he was, and you should have counted him cheaper in the months he spent away; but you shouldn't have given me a month's worth of old, nothing but a yard.
Levin also knew that the first thing to do when he returned home was to go to his wife, who had been ill; and that the men who had waited for him for three hours could wait; and he knew that, despite all the pleasure they had experienced in planting the pond, they should have lost that pleasure and, by allowing the old man to plant his horn without himself, to go and interpret with the men who found him on the bees.
If he did wrong well, he didn't know, and not only would he not prove it now, but he avoided talking and thinking about it.
His reasoning cast doubt on him and prevented him from seeing what he should and should not see.
When he did not think but lived, he felt in his heart the presence of an infallible judge, who decided, who of the two possible actions was better and worse; and as soon as he did wrong, he felt it immediately.
Thus he lived without knowing or seeing the possibility of knowing what he was and what he was for, and tormented by this ignorance to the extent that he feared suicide, while at the same time firmly paving his own special, certain path in life.
On the day Koznyshev came to Pokrovsky, Levin was in one of his most painful days.
There was the most hasty working time in which the people as a whole are exposed to such extraordinary self-sacrifice in labour as is not evident in any other living environment, and which would have been appreciated if the people who display these qualities had valued them themselves, had it not been repeated every year and had the consequences not been so simple.
It seems simple and simple, and in order to do so, all the villagers must work from the old to the small, without losing three or four weeks more than usual, eating kvass, onions and black bread, hammering and taking sleep at night and giving up sleep no more than two or three hours a day.
And every year, it's done all over Russia.
Having lived most of his life in the village and in close association with the people, Levin always felt, during the working hours, that this general popular excitement was communicated to him as well.
In the morning, he drove to the first crop of rye, on an oatmeal that had been taken to the scorch, and when he returned to his wife and sister-in-law's house, he drank coffee with them and walked to the back of the chute, where he had to launch a newly installed seed mill.
All day long, this Levin, talking to the orderman and the men and the house, talking to the wife, to Dolly, to her children, to her father-in-law, thought of one and one thing that occupied him at that time, in addition to his economic concerns, and kept looking at his question: "What am I? Where am I? And why am I here?"
Standing in the cooler of a newly covered riga with a still smelly leaf of hazelnut bars pressed against the freshly hamstrung oxen lags of the straw roof, Levin looked through the open gate, in which the dry and bitter dust of the moth was pushed and played, at the hot sun-lit gumna grass and fresh straw, just made from the shed, at the pestro-headed white-breasts, with the whistling of wings coming under the roof, and the curling of wings stopping in the gates, at the people who were crucified in the dark and dusty riga, and thought strange thoughts.
"Why are you doing this? 'He thought.' 'Why am I standing here making them work?
What are they all working on and trying to show me their hard work?
What's that old woman Matrena beating out of, my friend? (I treated her when a math fell on her in the fire),' he thought, looking at a skinny woman who, moving grains, was racing hard with her black-burned bare feet on a rough, hard current. 'Then she recovered; but not today-tomorrow, ten years from now, she will be buried, and there will be nothing left of her or of that slut in the red pane, which is so smooth and gentle that it beats out of the meakina ear.
And she'll be buried, and the pogo merina of this bloated nostrils is a horse crossing a lean wheel from beneath it. 'And she shall be buried, and Fedora shall be buried with his curly beard full of flesh and a shirt torn on his white shoulder.'
And he's tearing up his snoops, and he's in charge, and he's yelling at the women, and he's making a quick adjustment to the belt on the wave wheel.
And most importantly, it's not just them, but I'm gonna be buried, and there's nothing left.
Why?"
He thought it, and he looked at the clock to figure out how much they'd put in an hour.
He needed to know that in order to learn a lesson for the day.
"It's about an hour before the third cop starts," thought Levin, approached the pitcher, and screaming at the sound of the car, told him to let him out less often.
'You serve a lot, Fedor!
You see, it's locked, it's not a bet.
Fix it! — Psalm 37: 1.
Black from sweaty dust Fedor screamed back, but it wasn't what Levin wanted.
Levin went up to the drum and suspended Fedor and began serving himself.
After working for a man who wasn't long before lunch, he and the pitcher came out of the riga and had a conversation with him, standing by for a neat yellow scord with a hot rye.
The pitcher was from a far - away village from the one where Levin had previously given the land to the gunpowder.
Now she's been given to the janitor of the house.
Levin spoke to the pitcher Fedor about the land and asked if Plato, a rich and good man of the same village, would take the land next year.
'The cost of the road, Plato cannot help, Konstantin Dmitrich,' answered the man, choosing the corn from the sweaty bosom.
'How does Cyril help?'
'Mityuhe (so called a janitor's man in contempt), Konstantin Dmitrich, how can we not help!
This one's gonna press, and he's gonna pick his.
He won't regret it.
And Uncle Fokanyc, who's gonna take the skin off a man? Where he owes it, where he'll pay it.
An isn't gonna make it. Same person.
'Why would he come down?'
'That's right, so people are different; one person lives for his own sake, even if Mithukha, only in the stomach, and Focanich is a true old man.
He lives for the soul. God remembers.
'How does God remember?
How does the soul live? 'About to scream Levin.'
'It is known as, in truth, in God's way.
Because people are different.
Here, at least take you, don't hurt a man either...
'Yes, yes, goodbye!' said Levin, suffocating with excitement, and turned around and took his stick and quickly went away to the house.
Levin had a new joyous feeling. In the words of the man that Focanic lives for the soul, truly, God for God's sake, vague, but significant thoughts in the crowd, as if they had broken out of some sort of lock-in and, in pursuit of one goal, were all dizzy in his head, blinding him with their light.
Levin walked in great steps along the great road, listening not so much to his thoughts (he could not yet dissect them), but to the mental state that he had never experienced before.
The words spoken by the man caused an electric spark in his soul that suddenly transformed and united into a whole bunch of scattered, powerless individual thoughts that never ceased to occupy him.
The thought of such a thing was invisible to him at the time when he was talking about giving up the land.
He felt something new in his soul, and with pleasure felt it new, not knowing what it was.
"It's not for your own needs to live, it's for God. For what god?
For God's sake.
And what is more pointless than what he said?
He said that you don't have to live for your needs, that you don't have to live for what we understand, what we want, what we want, and you have to live for something we don't understand, for a god no one can tell.
What's that?
Didn't I understand those pointless words of Fedor?
Did you understand their justice? Did you find them stupid, unclear, inaccurate?
No, I understood it, and I understood it exactly as he understood it, and I understood it more clearly than I understood anything in my life, and I've never doubted it in my life, and I can't think of that.
And it's not me alone, it's everyone, the whole world understands it, and one thing they don't doubt, and they always agree.
Fedor says Kirillov, the janitor, lives for his belly.
That's understandable and reasonable.
We're all like intelligent beings, we can't live like a belly.
All of a sudden, the same Fedor says it's bad for the belly, and you have to live for the truth, for God's sake, and I get it!
And me and the millions of people who lived centuries ago and who now live, the men, the poor and the wise, who thought and wrote about it with their vague language, say the same thing -- we all agree on one thing: what needs to live and what is good.
I have only one solid, certain and clear knowledge with all people, and knowledge cannot be explained by reason -- it is outside it and has no reason and can have no consequences.
If good has a reason, it is no longer good; if it has a consequence, it is not good.
So good is out of the chain of causes and effects.
And I know him, and we all know him.
And I was looking for miracles, and I wish I'd seen a miracle that convinced me.
But it's a miracle, the only thing that ever exists, on all sides that surrounds me, and I didn't notice it!
What miracle could be greater than that?
Have I found a solution to everything, that my suffering is now over?" 'I thought Levin, walking on a dusty road, neither seeing heat nor fatigue, and feeling satisfied with long suffering.'
The feeling was so happy that it seemed unbelievable to him.
He was suffocating with excitement and, unable to move on, went off the road into the woods and sat in the shadow of the donkey on an unspoiled grass.
He took his hat off his sweaty head and lied on his hand, on a juicy, puffy forest grass.
"Yeah, you have to remember and think about it," he thought, looking closely at the herb that was in front of him, and watching the movement of the green bug that was climbing the stem of the burrow and held in its rise by the leaf of the dream. 'All at first,' he said to himself, turning away the leaf of the dream so that it would not interfere with the bug, and folding the other grass so that the bug would pass onto it. 'What makes me happy?
What did I discover?
I used to say that in my body, in the body of this herb and this bug (when she didn't want that grass, spread her wings, and flew away) there was a physical, chemical, physiological exchange of matter.
And in all of us, with the donkeys, with the clouds, with the fog spots, there is development.
Development out of what? What?
Infinite development and struggle?...
There could be some kind of direction and a struggle in the infinite!
And I was surprised that, despite the greatest stress of my mind on this path, I still did not see the meaning of life, the meaning of my motives and my aspirations.
And the point of my motives in me is so clear that I live on it all the time, and I was surprised and happy when the man told me to live for God, for the soul.
I didn't open anything.
I just found out what I know.
I understood the power that had given me life in more than one past, but now it's giving me life.
I'm free from deception, I recognize the master."
And he briefly repeated to himself the full course of his thoughts over the past two years, the beginning of which was a clear, obvious thought of dying when he saw a beloved, hopelessly ill brother.
The first time he realized that for every human being and for him there was nothing but suffering, death and eternal oblivion, he decided that it was impossible to live, that it was necessary either to explain his life in such a way that it did not appear to be the evil ridicule of some devil, or to shoot himself.
But he did not do both, but kept on living, thinking, and feeling, and even at the same time he got married and enjoyed a lot of joy and was happy when he did not think about the meaning of his life.
What was that supposed to mean?
It meant he lived well, but he thought badly.
He lived (not realizing this) with the spiritual truths that he sucked up with milk, thinking not only that he did not acknowledge those truths, but that he did so with care.
It was now clear to him that he could only live because of the beliefs in which he was raised.
"Why would I be like this and live my life if I didn't have those beliefs, didn't know I had to live for God, not for my own needs?
I'd rob, lie, kill.
Nothing that represents the greatest joys of my life would exist for me."
And while he was making the greatest effort of imagination, he couldn't have imagined the beast he himself would have been if he hadn't known what he was living for.
"I was looking for an answer to my question.
And the answer to my question could not give me the thought -- it is not commensurate with the question.
The answer was life itself, in my knowledge of what was good and what was wrong.
And this knowledge I have gained nothing, but it was given to me with all of them, because I could not take it from anywhere.
Where did I get this?
In my mind, have I come to love my neighbor and not strangle him?
I was told that when I was a kid, and I was happy to believe it because I was told what was in my heart.
Who opened this?
Not the mind.
The mind has set in motion a struggle for existence and a law that requires the strangulation of all those who stand in the way of my wishes.
It's a conclusion of the mind.
And to love someone else, he couldn't open his mind because it was unreasonable."
"Yeah, pride," he said to himself, falling over his stomach and starting to tie herbs with a knot, trying not to break them.
"And not just the pride of the mind, but the stupidity of the mind.
And most important of all, it's cheating, it's the hilariousness of the mind.
It is the fraud of the mind," he repeated.
Levin was reminded of the recent scene with Dolly and her children.
The children, alone, started roasting raspberry on candles and pouring milk fountains into their mouths.
The mother, having forced them to do so, began to tell them at Levin how hard it was for them to destroy what they were doing, and that the work was being done for them, that if they beat cups, they would have nothing to drink, and if they were to pour milk, they would have nothing to eat, and they would starve to death.
Levin was struck by the calm, depressing mistrust with which the children listened to the mother's words.
They were only upset that their game of entertainment had stopped, and they did not believe a word that their mother had said.
They couldn't believe it because they couldn't imagine the full extent of what they were using, so they couldn't imagine that what they were destroying was what they were living.
'It's all in itself,' they thought, 'and there's nothing interesting and important about it, because it's always been and always will be.
It's always the same.
We don't have anything to think about, it's ready, and we want to make up something new and new.
So we made up our mind to put the raspberry in a cup and fry it on a candle and pour the milk into each other's mouth with a fountain.
It's fun and new and nothing worse than drinking out of cups."
"Isn't that what we're doing, doing with my mind, finding out the meaning of nature's forces and the meaning of human life?" 'He kept thinking.'
"Isn't that what all theories of philosophy do, through thought, strange, uninhabitable to man, leading him to know what he's known for a long time, and so it's true that he couldn't have lived without it?
Isn't it clear from the evolution of every philosopher's theory that he knows as clearly as Fedor's man does, and that nothing is clearer than him, the main meaning of life, and only the questionable mental path he wants to go back to what everyone knows?
Let's just let some kids have their own children, make their own dishes, soak up their milk, etc.
Would they be naughty?
They'd starve to death.
Come on, let us in with our passions, our thoughts, no idea of a single god and a creator! Or no idea what good is, no explanation for the evil of morality.
I don't want you to build anything without that.
We only destroy because we are spiritually full.
It's the kids!
Why do I have a joyous, shared knowledge with a man, one of which gives me peace of mind?
Where did I get this?
I, raised in the notion of God, a Christian, have filled my whole life with the spiritual benefits that Christianity has given me, full of all and living of these benefits, as children, without understanding them, I destroy, that is, I want to destroy what I live.
And as soon as an important moment of life comes, like children, when they're cold and hungry, I go to him, and even less than the children that my mother blames for their childish pranks, I feel that my children's efforts to be pissed off are not read to me.
Yeah, what I know, I don't know with reason, which is given to me, revealed to me, and I know it with my heart, faith in the church's most important confession."
"Church?
Church!" 'Saying again, Levin went to the other side, and turned his back on his hand, and looked away at the flock that was on the other side of the river.
"But can I believe everything the church does? 'He thought, testing himself and inventing all that could have destroyed his current calm.'
He deliberately remembered the teachings of the church that had always seemed strange to him and seduced him. 'Creature?
What did I explain the existence?
Existence?
Nothing? 'The Devil and Sin?' 'And what do I explain evil?'
The Redeemer?
But I don't know anything, I don't know anything, and I can't know as long as what I'm told with everyone."
And he now felt that there was no faith in the church that would violate the most important thing -- belief in God, in good as the sole purpose of man.
For every faith in the church, faith in the service of truth could be framed instead of need.
And not only did they not violate it, but it was necessary for the most important miracle to be carried out on earth, which constantly manifests itself, that everyone, along with millions of the most diverse people, wise and devious, children and the elderly -- with everyone, with a man, with a Lvov, with Kitty, with beggars and kings -- would be able to understand the same thing and make the life of the soul for which one is worth living and for which one of us values.
Lying on his back, he now looked at the high, cloudless sky.
"Don't I know that this is an infinite space and that it is not a round circle?
But as much as I sneak around and harden my eyesight, I can't see it round and round, and despite my knowledge of infinite space, I'm certainly right when I see a solid blue wall, I'm more right than when I try to see it."
Levin stopped thinking and only listened to mysterious voices about something happy and anxious to talk to one another.
"Is that faith? 'He thought, fearing to believe his happiness.' 'Oh, my God, thank you!' 'He spoke, swallowing up the crying, and wiped with both hands the tears that were full of his eyes.'
Levin looked before him, and saw the flock, and then saw his raven cart, and the crow, who came up to the flock and spoke to the shepherd; then he heard from him the sound of the wheels and the curling of a fat horse; but he was so consumed with his thoughts that he did not think about why he was going to him.
He only remembered it when the coachman, when he was on his way to see him, screamed at him.
'The lady has been sent.
There's a brother here and some other baron.
Levin sat in the cart and took the lead.
As if when he had woken up from sleep, Levin could not remember for long.
He looked around the fat horse, washed between his legs and on the neck, where the leash was rubbing, looked around Ivan the Kucher sitting next to him, and remembered that he was waiting for his brother, that his wife was probably worried about his long absence, and tried to guess who was the guest who came with his brother.
Both a brother and a wife and an unknown guest were now presented to him differently than before.
He felt that his relationship with all people would be different now.
"There will be no longer any isolation between us; there will be no dispute with Kitty; there will be no quarrel with anyone, no matter who he is, no matter who he is, there will be affection and kindness; with people, with Ivan, everything will be different."
By keeping the good horse from waiting and asking for a move on the tight leaders, Levin looked back at Ivan, who sat by himself, who did not know what to do with his remaining hands, and held his shirt constantly, and sought an excuse to start talking to him.
He was gonna say that Ivan had a high profile for nothing, but it was like reproach, and he wanted to have a love conversation. He didn't think of anything else.
'You may take the stump to the right, or you may take the stump,' said the coachman, adjusting for the driving of Levin.
'Please don't touch me or teach me!' said Levin, angry with the cougher's intervention.
Just as he always did, his intervention would be annoying, and immediately he felt sad, as his assumption that the mood might change him immediately in contact with reality was mistaken.
Without reaching a quarter of the rows from the house, Levin saw those running toward Grisha and Tanya.
'Uncle Kostya!
And Mom goes, and Grandpa and Sergei Ivanovich and someone else,' they said, climbing on the cart.
'Who is it?
'Awful scary!
And that's what she does with her hands,' said Tanya, climbing up in the cart and mocking Katavasova.
'Aren't you old or young? 'Laughing,' said Levin, to whom Tanya's performance reminded someone.
"Oh, don't be a nasty man!" 'I thought Levin.'
It was only by turning the road and by seeing those who were walking towards it that Levin recognized Katavasov in a straw hat that walked, just as twirling with his hands as Tanya represented.
Katavasov was very fond of talking about philosophy, having a notion of philosophy from naturalists who had never studied philosophy; and Levin recently argued with it in Moscow.
And one such conversation, in which Katavasov apparently thought he had won, was the first thing Levin remembered when he recognized him.
"No, I'm not gonna argue and say my thoughts lightly," he thought.
When Levin came out of the cart and said hello to his brother and Katavasov, he asked about his wife.
'She carried Matthew to Kolok (it was a forest near the house).
I wanted to get him there, or it was hot in the house,' said Dolly.
Levin always advised his wife to carry a child in the woods, finding it dangerous, and the news was unpleasant to him.
'He is carrying him from place to place,' said the prince, smiling. 'I advised her to try to tear it down on the glacier.
'She wanted to come to the beekeeper.
She thought you were there.
We're going there,' said Dolly.
'Well, what are you doing? 'Oh, Koznyshev said, standing back and standing up to his brother.'
'No big deal.'
As always, I'm doing the housekeeping,' answered Levin. 'How long are you going to be?'
We've waited so long.
'Two weeks off.
There's a lot to do in Moscow.
With these words, the eyes of the brothers met, and Levin, despite his constant and now particularly strong desire to be in friendly and, heads--but, a simple relationship with his brother, felt uncomfortable looking at him.
He looked down and didn't know what to say.
Picking up the subjects of the conversation such as would please Sergei Ivanovic and distract him from the conversation about the Serbian war and the Slavic Wop-dew, about which he had hinted by referring to activities in Moscow, Levin spoke about the book of Sergei Ivanovic.
'Are there any reviews of your book?' 'He asked.'
Sergei Ivanovic smiled at the deliberateness of the question.
'No one is doing it, and I am the least of the others,' he said. 'Look, Daria Alexandrovna, it will rain,' he added, pointing an umbrella to the oxen of white clouds above the tops.
And it was enough that it was not hostile, but the cold attitude toward one another that Levin so wanted to avoid was again established among the brothers.
Levin approached Katavasov.
'How well you did that you wanted to come,' he said.
'I've been going on a long time.
Now, let's talk, let's see.
Did you read Spencer?
'No, I'm not finished,' said Levin. 'I don't need it now, though.
'How so?
That's interesting.
Why?
'In other words, I have made sure that I will not find a solution to the issues that affect me in him or in him.
Now...
But the calm and hilarious expression of Katavasov's face suddenly struck him, and he felt so sorry for his mood, which he apparently violated by this conversation, that he had stopped after remembering his purpose.
'But we shall talk after that,' he added. 'If the beekeeper is here on this path,' he turned to everything.
Having reached the narrow path to the unscathed field, covered on one side by a full, bright Ivan da maria, which often included the growth of dark green, tall bushes, Levin placed his guests in the thick, fresh shadow of young wasps, on benches and cuts deliberately prepared for the beekeeper's visitors, afraid of bees, and went to the occipital to bring children and large bread, cucumbers, and fresh honey.
By trying to make as little movement as possible and listening to the bees that were passing more and more often, he walked on the path to the desert.
One bee groaned in his beard in the most hay, but he carefully sprung it out.
When he entered the shaded hay, he removed from the wall his net hanged on the crib, and put it on his pockets, and put his hands in his pockets, and went out to the fenced beekeeper, in which the right rows tied to the pins stood among the shrivelled place, all those he knew, each with its own history, old hives, and on the walls of the lashes of the young ones planted this year.
Before the summers, the hives were ripped in the eyes, spinning and ploughing in one place, playing bees and trouts, and among them, all in the same direction, in the forest, in the flowering lip and back to the hives, the working bees, with bribes and bribes, passed.
There was a variety of sounds in the ears, a busy business, a fast-flying workbee, a trumpeter, a party of truancy, agitated, protective of the enemy's wealth, and a party to sting the Karaultz bees.
On the other side of the fence, the old man was hard on the hoop and did not see Levin. Levin stopped at the middle of the beekeeper without calling him.
He was happy to be alone to recall the reality that had already brought down his mood in such a way.
He remembered that he had already had time to be angry with Ivan, to show coldness to his brother, and to speak to Katavasov lightly.
"Was it just a moment's mood, and it will pass without leaving a trace?" 'He thought.'
But at the same moment, when he returned to his mood, he was happy to feel that something new and important had happened in him.
The reality only for a while caused the peace of mind that he found; but it was whole in him.
Just as the bees, now hanging around him, threatening him and entertaining him, deprived him of complete physical peace, forced him to compress, avoiding them, so exactly, by walking around him from the moment he sat in the cart, depriving him of his freedom of mind; but it only continued as long as he was among them.
In spite of the bees, his physical strength was intact, and his new spiritual power was intact.
'Do you know, Kostya, who Koznyshev was coming here with?' 'Dolly said, wearing cucumbers and honey to the children. 'With Vronski!
He's going to Serbia.
'It's not just one, but the squadron's keeping it to himself! 'Katawasov said.'